District of Columbia statutes.
29-705.09

Liability for improper distributions.

(a)

A general partner that consents to a distribution made in violation of § 29-705.08 shall be personally liable to the limited partnership for the amount of the distribution which exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without the violation if it is established that in consenting to the distribution the general partner failed to comply with § 29-704.08.

(b)

A partner or transferee that received a distribution knowing that the distribution to that partner or transferee was made in violation of § 29-705.08 shall be personally liable to the limited partnership but only to the extent that the distribution received by the partner or transferee exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid under § 29-705.08.

(c)

A general partner against which an action is commenced under subsection (a) of this section may implead in the action any:

(1)

Other person that is liable under subsection (a) of this section and compel contribution from the person; and

(2)

Person that received a distribution in violation of subsection (b) of this section and compel contribution from the person in the amount the person received in violation of subsection (b) of this section.

(d)

An action under this section shall be barred if it is not commenced within 2 years after the distribution.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-704.09 and § 29-707.02.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 509 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).